Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-807
Assessments and losses; actions to recover.

Suits at law may be brought against any member who shall neglect or refuse to pay any assessment made against him, in the same manner as for the collection of any other debt; and a member may bring an action against the company for any loss sustained.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 129, p. 464;

R.S.1913, § 3266;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. X, § 6, p. 645;

C.S.1922, § 7865;

C.S.1929, § 44-906;

R.S.1943, § 44-807.